District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.21

Electronic transactions.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the CPO may acquire supplies and services through:

(1)

Electronic solicitation and bid response; or

(2)

Electronic auctions.

(b)

In selecting one of the methods authorized by this section, upon proper validation and authorization, a contracting officer may accept electronic signatures for all electronic commerce transactions.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1201
as added Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(f), 56 DCR 6603
This section is referenced in § 2-312.01.
2001 Ed., § 2-312.01.